Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 1. Uniform Act to Secure Attendance in Criminal Proceedings.

Sec. 12.50.010.
Witness subpoenaed in this state to testify in another state.

If a judge of a court of record in any state which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within the state to attend and testify in this state certifies under the seal of the court that there is a criminal prosecution pending in the court, or that a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence, that a person within this state is a material witness in that prosecution or grand jury investigation, and that the presence of that person will be required for a specified number of days, then, upon presentation of the certificate to a judge of a court of record in the judicial district in which the person is, the judge shall fix a time and place for a hearing and shall make an order directing the witness to appear at a time and place certain for the hearing.

If at a hearing the judge determines that the witness is material and necessary, that it will not cause undue hardship to the witness to be compelled to attend and testify in the prosecution or grand jury investigation in the other state, and that the laws of the state in which the prosecution is pending or grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence will give to the witness protection from arrest and the service of civil and criminal process, the judge shall issue a subpoena, with a copy of the certificate attached, directing the witness to attend and testify in the court where the prosecution is pending or where a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence at a time and place specified in the subpoena. In any such hearing the certificate shall be prima facie evidence of all of the facts stated therein.

If the certificate recommends that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state to assure attendance in the requesting state, the judge may, in lieu of notification of the hearing, direct that the witness be immediately brought before the judge for said hearing; and if the judge at the hearing is satisfied of the desirability of the custody and delivery, for which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof of this desirability, the judge may, in lieu of issuing subpoena, order that the witness be immediately taken into custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state.

If the witness who is subpoenaed as provided in this section, after being paid or tendered by a properly authorized person a sum equivalent to the cost of air fare round trip passage on a certificated carrier or such prepaid passage and reasonable incidental travel allowance for going to and from airports plus $20 per day for each day that the witness is required to travel and attend as a witness, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the subpoena, the witness shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of a witness who disobeys a subpoena issued from a court of record in this state.

History.

(§ 7.04 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.50.020.
Witness from another state subpoenaed to testify in this state.

If a person in a state which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons inside its borders to attend and testify in criminal prosecutions or grand jury investigations commenced or about to commence in this state as a material witness in a criminal action pending in a court of record of this state, or in a grand jury investigation which has commenced or is about to commence, a judge of the court may issue a certificate under the seal of the court stating these facts and specifying the number of days the witness will be required. The certificate may include a recommendation that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of this state to assure attendance in this state. This certificate shall be presented to a judge of a court of record in the county or judicial district in which the witness is found. This order of a court in the other state delivering custody of a witness to an officer of this state shall be sufficient authority to an officer of this state to take the witness into custody and hold the witness until discharged by a court of this state.

If the witness is subpoenaed to attend and testify in this state the witness shall be tendered a sum equivalent to the cost of air fare round trip passage on a certificated carrier or such prepaid passage and reasonable incidental travel allowance for going to and from airports plus $20 per day for each day that the witness is required to travel and attend as a witness. A witness who has appeared in accordance with the provisions of the subpoena shall not be required to remain within the state a longer period of time than the period mentioned in the certificate, unless otherwise ordered by the court. If the witness, after coming into this state, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the subpoena, the witness shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a subpoena issued from a court of record in this state.

History.

(§ 7.05 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.50.030.
Immunity of witness from arrest or service of process.

If a person comes into this state in obedience to a subpoena directing the person to attend and testify in this state, the person shall not, while in this state pursuant to the subpoena, be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before entering this state under the subpoena.

History.

(§ 7.06 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.50.040.
Immunity of foreign witness passing through state from arrest or process.

If a person passes through this state while going to another state in obedience to a subpoena to attend and testify in that state or while returning therefrom, the person shall not, while so passing through this state, be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before entering this state under the subpoena.

History.

(§ 7.07 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.50.050.
Party seeking witness.

The right to obtain witnesses under AS

12.50.010

—

12.50.080

in criminal proceedings shall extend to the state or a defendant.
Witness fees shall be paid by the party calling the witness, except as provided in Rule 17(b), Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure. If the time estimate in the certificate of the requesting court is exceeded, the nonindigent defendant shall be required to tender additional per diem or post bond to insure payment of total witness fees.

History.

(§ 7.09 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.50.060.
Uniformity of interpretation.

AS

12.50.010

—

12.50.080

shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate the general purpose to make uniform the laws of the states which enact similar legislation.

History.

(§ 7.08 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.50.070.
Definitions.

In AS

12.50.010

—

12.50.080

,

“state” means a state, territory of the United States, and the District of Columbia;

“subpoena” includes a summons in a state where a summons is used in lieu of subpoena, order, or other notice requiring the appearance of a witness; the word subpoena also includes a subpoena duces tecum;

“witness” includes a person whose testimony is desired in a proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in a criminal action, prosecution, or proceeding.

History.

(§ 7.03 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.50.080.
Short title.

AS

12.50.010

—

12.50.080

may be cited as the Uniform Act to Secure Attendance of Witnesses in Criminal Proceedings.

History.

(§ 7.10 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Secs. 12.50.090 — 12.50.100.
Material witnesses.
[Repealed, § 2 ch 20 SLA 1966.
For current law, see AS 12.30.050.]

For current law, see AS

12.30.050

.

For current law, see AS

12.30.050

.